Florida, session 2026, SB1106.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 18 19 Section 1.âThis act may be cited as the âRecognizing Judea 20 and Samaria Act.â 21 Section 2.âSection 1.016, Florida Statutes, is created to 22 read: 23 1.016âRecognizing Judea and Samaria.â 24 (1)âLEGISLATIVE INTENT.âIt is the intent of the Legislature 25 to: 26 (a)âRefer to the land liberated by Israel from Jordan 27 during the 1967 Six-Day War by its historical name of âJudea and 28 Samaria,â with the land south of Jerusalem being considered 29 âJudeaâ and the land north of Jerusalem being considered 30 âSamaria.â 31 (b)âNo longer use the term âWest Bankâ in official 32 government materials. 33 (2)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this act, the term: 34 (a)ââOfficial government materialâ means a guidance, rule, 35 material, briefing, press release, communication, or work 36 product document prepared by a state agency. 37 (b)ââState agencyâ means every department, division, 38 office, board, commission, and institution of this state. 39 (3)âPROHIBITIONS.âA state agency may not use the term âWest 40 Bankâ to refer to Judea and Samaria in an official government 41 material or use moneys to create an official government material 42 that refers to Judea and Samaria as âWest Bank.â 43 Section 3.âInstructional materials, as defined in s. 44 1006.28(1)(a), Florida Statutes, and library media center 45 collections that are adopted on or after July 1, 2026, by a 46 district school board or charter school governing board must 47 refer to the land liberated by Israel from Jordan during the 48 1967 Six-Day War by its historical name of âJudea and Samaria,â 49 with the land south of Jerusalem being considered âJudeaâ and 50 the land north of Jerusalem being considered âSamaria.â Such 51 materials and collections adopted on or after July 1, 2026, by a 52 district school board or charter school governing board may not 53 use the term âWest Bankâ to refer to Judea and Samaria. 54 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.